Utah statutes.
15-4-1.   Definitions.

In this chapter:

(1)  "Obligation" includes a liability in tort and contractual obligations;

(2)  "Obligee" includes a creditor and a person having a right based on a tort;

(3)  "Obligor" includes a debtor and a person liable for a tort;

(4)  "Several obligors" means obligors severally bound for the same performance.



Amended by Chapter 257, 1991 General Session

